Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.22
Permitted improvements and growing crops of lessee; separate improvements; disagreement on value; appraisal.

The permitted improvements and growing crops covered by sections 72-240.10 to 72-240.23 and 72-258 shall be deemed to be separate permitted improvements and if the board and the lessee agree as to the value of some permitted improvements but disagree as to the value of others, only those on which they do not agree need be appraised under the appraisal provisions of sections 72-240.10 to 72-240.23 and 72-258.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 13, p. 1455;

Laws 1971, LB 413, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 38.